test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiqv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiʼv: # Noun 59 'eng /est kivi/fin' - full paradigm
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Nom: [kiʼv, kiv]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Gen: [kiʼv, kiv]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Par: [kiʼvvõ, kivvõ]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Dat: [kiʼvvõn, kivvõn]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ins: [kiʼvkõks, kivkõks]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ill: [kiʼvvõ, kivvõ]
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ela: [kiʼvstõ, kivstõ]
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Nom: kivīd
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Gen: kivīd
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Par: kivīdi
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Dat: kivīdõn
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ins: kivīdõks
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ill: kivīž
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ela: kivīst
